Hawaii statutes.
[§431:21-116] Examination. For the
purpose of ascertaining its condition, or compliance with this article, the
commissioner, as often as the commissioner deems advisable, may examine the
accounts, records, documents, and transactions of the association. The
association shall pay the expenses of the examination in accordance with
section 431:2-306(b). [L 1991, c 284, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next